Hawaii, session 2026, SB895.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that kindergarten assessments are intended to support early learning and inform instruction in a developmentally appropriate manner.  The legislature further finds that children require sufficient time to adjust to the kindergarten environment before meaningful assessments can occur. The legislature also finds that kindergarten teachers, through sustained daily interaction with students, are best positioned to conduct accurate, holistic assessments of a child's development and learning needs.  The original intent of kindergarten assessments was to support classroom instruction and family engagement, not to impose high-cost, externally developed assessment systems, or burdensome training requirements on teachers. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to revise the practice of kindergarten assessments to clarify legislative intent, restore teacher-led assessment practices, reduce unnecessary administrative and financial burdens, and ensure that kindergarten assessments remain developmentally appropriate and instructionally focused. SECTION 2.  Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part IV, subpart C, to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302A-    Kindergarten assessments.  (a)  Each kindergarten teacher shall conduct a kindergarten assessment for each child in the teacher's class. (b)  The kindergarten assessment shall: (1)  Assess each child in a developmentally appropriate manner to support instruction and student learning; (2)  Consist of a general, observational assessment of the child's development and school readiness, including but not limited to: (A)  Language and early literacy development; (B)  Cognitive and problem-solving skills; (C)  Social and emotional development; (D)  Physical development; and (E)  Whether the child attended preschool or another early learning program before entering kindergarten; and (3)  Be administered in two parts; provided that: (A)  The first assessment shall be completed within two months of each child's admission into kindergarten; and (B)  The second assessment shall be completed within the eighth month of the school year. (c)  Information obtained from the kindergarten assessments shall be used only for: (1)  Instructional planning; (2)  Identifying student support needs; and (3)  Communication with parents or guardians. Information obtained from the kindergarten assessments shall not be used for student retention, high-stakes accountability, school ranking, or teacher evaluation purposes. (d)  Kindergarten assessments shall not require the use of commercially developed, standardized, or externally contracted assessment instruments.  Kindergarten teachers shall not be required to complete any mandatory external certification or training, beyond the standard kindergarten teacher training required by the department, to administer kindergarten assessments. (e)  The board may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 to carry out the purposes of this section; provided that any rules adopted pursuant to this subsection shall preserve the professional judgement and discretion of kindergarten teachers." SECTION 3.  Section 302D-37, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§302D-37  Standardized assessment for students entering kindergarten.  (a)  The commission shall [adopt the kindergarten entry assessment adopted by the board pursuant to section 302A-1165(a) to assess all charter school students entering kindergarten within the first thirty days of admission into kindergarten. (b)  The commission may waive the requirements of the uniform kindergarten entry assessment on a case-by-case basis. (c)  The commission shall share the information gathered from public charter schools pursuant to this section with the department, department of human services, and executive office on early learning to the extent not otherwise prohibited by administrative rule or law.] require each charter school to implement kindergarten assessments consistent with section 302A-  , including requirements for teacher-led assessments, timelines, purposes, and limitations on the use of commercially developed or externally contracted assessment instruments." SECTION 4.  Section 346-186, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsections (a) and (b) to read as follows: "(a)  The department shall establish or augment an existing database to collect and analyze information it receives from the department of education pursuant to [sections 302A-1165 and] section 302A-1166 and the state public charter school commission pursuant to [sections 302D-37 and] section 302D-38 and any other information the department may collect on all children in the State who are three to four years old and children who will not be at least five years of age on or before July 31 of the current school year. (b)  To the extent not prohibited by administrative rule or law, the department, department of education, state public charter school commission, and executive office on early learning shall share any information gathered pursuant to sections [302A-1165,] 302A-1166[, 302D-37,] and 302D-38 with each other, along with any other information the department, department of education, or state public charter school commission may collect on all children in the State who are three to four years old and children who will not be at least five years of age on or before July 31 of the current school year." SECTION 5.  Section 302A-1165, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is repealed. ["§302A-1165  Standardized assessment for students entering kindergarten.  (a)  The board of education shall adopt a kindergarten entry assessment, and the department of education shall administer the kindergarten entry assessment. (b)  The kindergarten entry assessment shall: (1)  Be administered within the first thirty days of each child's admission into kindergarten; (2)  Be a uniform, statewide assessment; provided that the assessment shall be conducted in English or Hawaiian; (3)  Cover all essential domains of school readiness, including: (A)  Language and literacy development; (B)  Cognition and general knowledge; (C)  Approaches to learning; (D)  Physical well-being and motor development; and (E)  Social and emotional development; (4)  Be used in conformance with the recommendations of the National Research Council reports on early childhood; and (5)  Be valid and reliable for its intended purpose. (c)  Information obtained from the kindergarten entry assessments shall be used to: (1)  Close the school readiness gap at kindergarten entry; (2)  Inform instruction in the early elementary school grades; and (3)  Inform parents of their children's status and to involve parents in decisions regarding their children's education. (d)  The department shall share the information gathered pursuant to this section with the department of human services, executive office on early learning, and state public charter school commission to the extent not otherwise prohibited by administrative rule or law."] SECTION 6.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 7.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval.